Tennessee, session 114, HB1988.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 13-30-103(4), is amended by adding
the following new subdivisions:
(H) A municipality having a population of not less than one hundred sixty-six
thousand seven hundred (166,700) nor more than one hundred sixty-six thousand eight
hundred (166,800), according to the 2020 or a subsequent federal census; and
(I) A county having a population of not less than two hundred twenty thousand
(220,000) nor more than two hundred twenty thousand one hundred (220,100),
according to the 2020 or a subsequent federal census;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1988
010370
- 1 -